Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202214-1230
Bridge commission; plans and specifications; submission to city council.

The plans and specifications, the location, size, type, and method of construction, the boundaries and approaches, and the estimates of cost of construction and acquisition, provided for in sections 14-1228 and 14-1229, shall be first submitted to the city council and receive the approval of the city council before final adoption by the bridge commission, which shall have no power to proceed further until such approval has been given.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 14, p. 624;

C.S.1929, § 14-1214;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 3, p. 112;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1214;

R.S.1943, § 14-1230;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 263.
July 21, 2022